Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1304
Environmental health specialist, defined.

Environmental health specialist means a person who by education and experience in the physical, biological, and sanitary sciences is qualified to carry out educational, investigational, and technical duties in the field of environmental sanitation.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 525.